Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4211
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Property Tax Credit Cash Fund is created. The fund shall only be used pursuant to the Property Tax Credit Act. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2007, LB367, § 3.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.